Utah statutes.
48-3a-204.   Signing and filing pursuant to judicial order.

(1)  If a person required by this chapter to sign a record or deliver a record to the division for filing under this chapter does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the district court to order:

(a)  the person to sign the record;

(b)  the person to deliver the record to the division for filing; or

(c)  the division to file the record unsigned.

(2)  If a petitioner under Subsection (1) is not the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company a party to the action.

(3)  A record filed under Subsection (1)(c) is effective without being signed.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

